en: Baby health items included: Comb; Finger toothbrush; Gum massager; Hair brush; Medicine dropper; Nail clippers; Nasal aspirator; Storage case; Thermometer; Other
pt-BR: Itens de saúde do bebê incluídos: Pentear; Escova de dente; Massageador de gengiva; Escova de cabelo; Conta-gotas de remédio; Cortador de unhas; Aspirador nasal; Estojo de armazenamento; Termômetro; Outro
nl: Inclusief babygezondheidsartikelen: Kam; Vingertandenborstel; Tandvleesmasseur; Haarborstel; Medicijndruppelaar; Nagelschaartje; Neusaspirator; Opbergkoffer; Thermometer; Andere
fr: Articles de santé pour bébé inclus: Peigne; Brosse à dents à doigts; Masseur de gencives; Brosse à cheveux; Médicaments; Coupe-ongles; Mouche-bébés; Chariot de stockage; Thermomètre; Autre
hu: A tartalmazott babaegészséggel kapcsolatos termékek: Fésű; Ujjra húzható fogkefe; Ínymasszírozó; Hajkefe; Gyógyszeradagoló; Körömvágó; Orrszívó; Tárolótok; Hőmérő; Egyéb
es: Artículos de salud para bebés incluidos: Peine; Cepillo de dientes; Masajeador de encías; Cepillo para el cabello; Gotero de medicina; Cortauñas; Aspirador nasal; Estuche de almacenamiento; Termómetro; Otros
zh-CN: 包括婴儿保健用品: 梳子; 手指牙刷; 牙龈按摩器; 梳子; 医药用滴管; 指甲剪; 吸鼻器; 储物盒/储物箱; 温度计; 其他
sv: Babyhälsoartiklar ingår: Kam; Fingertandborste; Tandköttsmasserare; Hårborste; Medicinpipett; Nagelklippare; Nässug; Förvaringsväska; Termometer; Annat
ro-RO: Articole de îngrijire a sănătății pentru bebeluși incluse: Pieptene; Periuță de dinți pentru deget; Instrument de masaj gingival; Perie de păr; Pipetă; Unghiere; Aspirator nazal; Cutie de depozitare; Termometru; Altele
da: Babysundhedsartikler inkluderet: Kam; Finger-tandbørste; Gummimassageapparat; Hårbørste; Medicindropper; Negleklippere; Næsesuger; Opbevaringsetui; Termometer; Andet
it: Articoli per la salute del bambino inclusi: Pettine; Spazzolino da denti da dito; Massaggiatore gengivale; Spazzola per capelli; Contagocce; Tagliaunghie; Aspiratore nasale; Custodia; Termometro; Altro
tr: Bebek sağlığı ürünleri dahil: Tarak; Parmak diş fırçası; Diş eti masaj aleti; Saç fırçası; Damlalık; Tırnak makası; Burun aspiratörü; Saklama kasası; Termometre; Diğer
fi: Mukana vauvojen terveystuotteita: Kampa; Sormihammasharja; Ienhieroja; Hiusharja; Pipettipullot; Kynsileikkurit; Nenähengityslaite; Säilytyslaatikko; Lämpömittari; Muu
ko: 영유아 위생용품 포함: 빗; 손가락 칫솔; 잇몸 마사지기; 헤어 브러시; 의약품 스포이드; 손톱깎이; 콧물 흡입기; 수납용 카트; 온도계; 기타
sl-SI: Priloženi izdelki za zdravje dojenčka: Glavnik; Naprstna zobna ščetka; Masažer za dlesni; Krtača za lase; Kapalka za zdravila; Škarje za nohte; Nosni aspirator; Pohištveni sestav za shranjevanje; Termometer; Drugo
pl: W zestawie artykuły zdrowotne dla niemowląt: Grzebień; Nakładka na palec ze szczoteczką do zębów; Masażer dziąseł; Szczotka do włosów; Zakraplacz do leków; Obcinarki do paznokci; Aspirator donosowy; Futerał; Termometr; Pozostałe
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα βρεφικά είδη υγιεινής του μωρού: Χτένα; Δακτυλική οδοντόβουρτσα; Αξεσουάρ μάλαξης των ούλων; Βούρτσα μαλλιών; Σταγονόμετρο φαρμάκου; Νυχοκόπτες; Ρινικός αναπνευστήρας; Θήκη φύλαξης; Θερμόμετρο; Άλλο
th: รวมรายการสินค้าเพื่อสุขภาพทารก: หวี; แปรงสีฟันสวมนิ้ว; เครื่องนวดเหงือก; แปรงผม; ที่หยอดยา; กรรไกรตัดเล็บ; ที่ดูดน้ำมูก; กล่องเก็บของ; เทอร์โมมิเตอร์; อื่นๆ
cs: Obsažené položky sady pro péči o děti a kojence: Hřeben; Prstový zubní kartáček; Masážní přístroj na dásně; Kartáč na vlasy; Kapátko na léky; Kleště na nehty; Nosní odsávačka; Skladovací pouzdro; Teploměr; Jiné
vi: Bao gồm các mặt hàng sức khỏe cho bé: Lược; Bàn chải đánh răng đeo ngón tay; Dụng cụ massage nướu; Lược chải tóc; Ống nhỏ thuốc; Bấm móng tay; Dụng cụ hút mũi; Hộp bảo quản; Nhiệt kế; Khác
ru: Состав набора для ухода за детьми: Расческа; Зубная щетка на палец; Массажер для десен; Щетка для волос; Медицинская пипетка; Кусачки для ногтей; Назальный аспиратор; Кейс для хранения; Термометр; Другое
lt-LT: Komplekte esančios sveikatingumo prekės kūdikiams: Šukos; Ant piršto maunamas dantų šepetėlis; Dantenų masažuoklis; Plaukų šepetys; Vaistų pipetė; Nagų karpikliai; Nosies aspiratorius; Sandėliavimo dėžės; Termometras; Kita
ja: ベビー用健康アイテム (詳細): 櫛; 指歯ブラシ; 歯茎マッサージャー; ヘアブラシ; 薬用スポイト; 爪切り; 鼻水吸引器; 収納ケース; 体温計; その他
zh-TW: 嬰兒照護含有品項: 活頁線圈; 手指牙刷; 牙齦按摩器; 梳子; 處方藥物; 指甲剪; 吸鼻器; 收納箱; 溫度計; 其他
bg-BG: Включени продукти за здравето на бебето: Гребен; Четка за зъби за пръст; Масажор за венци; Четка за коса; Капкомер за лекарства; Нокторезачка; Аспиратор за нос; Калъф за съхранение; Термометър; Други
pt-PT: Itens de saúde do bebé incluídos: Pente; Escova de dentes de dedo; Massajador de gengivas; Escova de cabelo; Conta-gotas para medicamentos; Corta-unhas; Aspirador nasal; Caixa de armazenamento; Termómetro; Outro
nb: Inkluderte artikler for babyhelse: Kam; Fingertannbørste; Massasjeapparat for tannkjøtt; Hårbørste; Medisindråpeteller; Negleklippere; Nesesugere; Oppbevaringsboks; Termometer; Annen
hr-HR: Artikli u kompletu za zdravlje bebe: Češalj; Četkica za zube na prst; Masažer za desni; Četka za kosu; Kapaljka; Grickalice za nokte; Aspirator za nos; Kutija za pohranu; Termometar; Ostalo
de: Inbegriffene Gesundheitsartikel für Babys: Kamm; Fingerzahnbürste; Zahnfleisch-Massagegerät; Haarbürste; Medikamentenpipette; Nagelknipser; Nasensauger; Aufbewahrungsbehälter; Thermometer; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Zdravotné produkty pre bábätko v cene: Hrebeň; Prstová zubná kefka; Kefka na masáž ďasien; Kefa na vlasy; Kvapkadlo na lieky; Nožnice na nechty; Nosová odsávačka hlienov; Úložné puzdro; Teplomer; Iné